Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Article 10. Liability of Fiduciaries and Rights of Persons Dealing with Fiduciaries

§ 4-10-1001.
Remedies for breach of trust.

A violation by a fiduciary of a duty the fiduciary owes to a beneficiary is a breach of trust.

To remedy a breach of trust that has occurred or may occur, the court may:

Compel the fiduciary to perform the fiduciary’s duties;

Enjoin the fiduciary from committing a breach of trust;

Compel the fiduciary to redress a breach of trust by paying money, restoring property or other means;

Order a fiduciary to account;

Appoint a special fiduciary to take possession of the trust property and administer the trust;

Suspend the fiduciary;

Remove the fiduciary as provided in W.S.

4-10-706

;

Reduce or deny compensation to the fiduciary;

Subject to the rights of persons dealing with a fiduciary as provided in W.S.

4-10-1013

, void an act of the fiduciary, impose a lien or a constructive trust on trust property or trace trust property wrongfully disposed of and recover the property or its proceeds; or

Order any other appropriate relief.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Removal properly denied.—

It was no error to decline to remove a co-trustee because (1) any inaction by the co-trustee did not violate the co-trustee’s fiduciary duty or harm the trust, and (2) the co-trustee breached no duty of loyalty by seeking to terminate the trust, as the co-trustee was not solely obligated to act in the beneficiaries’ interests, hostility, dysfunction, and difficulty in administering the trust were alleged, and the hostility between the parties did not interfere with the trust’s administration. Redland v. Redland (In re Redland Family Trust), 2019 WY 17, 435 P.3d 349,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2019).

Cited in

Shriners Hosps. for Children v. First Northern Bank of Wyo., 2016 WY 51, 373 P.3d 392,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 4-10-1002.
Damages for breach of trust.

A fiduciary who commits a breach of trust is liable to the beneficiaries affected for the greater of:

The amount required to restore the value of the trust property and trust distributions to what they would have been had the breach not occurred; or

The profit the fiduciary made by reason of the breach.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if more than one (1) fiduciary is liable to the beneficiaries for a breach of trust, a fiduciary is entitled to contribution from the other fiduciary or fiduciaries. A fiduciary is not entitled to contribution if the fiduciary was substantially more at fault than another fiduciary or if the fiduciary committed the breach of trust in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the interests of the beneficiaries. A fiduciary who received a benefit from the breach of trust is not entitled to contribution from another fiduciary to the extent of the benefit received.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1003.
Damages in absence of breach.

A fiduciary is accountable to an affected beneficiary for any profit made by the fiduciary arising from the administration of the trust, even absent a breach of trust.

Absent a breach of trust, a fiduciary is not liable to a beneficiary for a loss or depreciation in the value of trust property or for not having made a profit.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1004.
Attorney's fees and costs.

In a judicial proceeding involving the administration of a trust, the court, as justice and equity may require, may award costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, to any party, to be paid by another party or from the trust that is the subject of the controversy.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Attorney fees granted.—

Attorney fees denied. —

Attorney fees granted.—

Trust beneficiaries were entitled to an award of attorney fees against a trustee because the trustee brought a frivolous claim against the beneficiaries. Acorn v. Moncecchi, 2016 WY 124, 386 P.3d 739,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2016).

Attorney fees denied. —

Justice and equity did not support an award of attorney fees to the trust beneficiary under this section given that she did not demonstrate that the trustee improperly performed any part of his duties as trustee. Evans v. Moyer, 2012 WY 111, 282 P.3d 1203,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2012).

District court did not abuse its discretion in ordering a beneficiary to pay attorney's fees, rather than the trust, where its actions against the trustee and the trust were taken with utter disregard for the settlor' intentions to retain the ranch. Shriners Hosps. for Children v. First Northern Bank of Wyo., 2016 WY 51, 373 P.3d 392,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 4-10-1005.
Limitation of action against fiduciary.

A beneficiary may not commence a proceeding against a fiduciary for breach of trust more than two (2) years after the date the beneficiary or a representative of the beneficiary received a report that adequately disclosed the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust and informed the beneficiary of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

A report adequately discloses the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary or representative knows of the potential claim or should have inquired into its existence.

If subsection (a) of this section does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a beneficiary against a fiduciary for breach of trust shall be commenced within three (3) years after the first of the following to occur:

The removal, resignation or death of the fiduciary;

The termination of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust; or

The termination of the trust.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1006.
Reliance on trust instrument.

A fiduciary who acts in reasonable reliance on the terms of the trust as expressed in the trust instrument is not liable to a beneficiary for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1007.
Event affecting administration or distribution.

If the happening of an event, including marriage, divorce, performance of educational requirements or death, affects the administration or distribution of a trust, a fiduciary who has exercised reasonable care to ascertain the happening of the event is not liable for a loss resulting from the fiduciary’s lack of knowledge.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1008.
Exculpation of fiduciaries.

A term of a trust relieving a fiduciary of liability for breach of trust is unenforceable to the extent that it:

Relieves the fiduciary of liability for breach of trust committed in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the trust or the interests of the beneficiaries; or

Was inserted as the result of an abuse by the fiduciary of a fiduciary or confidential relationship to the settlor.

An exculpatory term drafted or caused to be drafted by the fiduciary is invalid as an abuse of a fiduciary or confidential relationship unless the fiduciary proves that the exculpatory term is fair under the circumstances and that its existence and contents were adequately communicated to the settlor.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1009.
Beneficiary's consent, release or ratification.

A fiduciary is not liable to a beneficiary for breach of trust if the beneficiary consented in writing to the conduct constituting the breach, released the fiduciary from liability for the breach or ratified the transaction constituting the breach, unless:

The consent, release or ratification of the beneficiary was induced by improper conduct of the fiduciary; or

At the time of the consent, release or ratification, the beneficiary did not know of the beneficiary’s rights or of the material facts relating to the breach.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Transactions in which sisters disclaimed their interest in trust property were not voidable. —

Judgment was properly awarded to a brother in sisters'
action claiming that the brother, as trustee of a family trust, wrongfully induced them to disclaim their interest in a large portion of trust property because the transactions were not voidable; the sisters did not dispute that they signed the documents indicating their consent to the brother taking title to the trust property.
Mendoza v. Gonzales, 2009 WY 50, 204 P.3d 995,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2009).

§ 4-10-1010.
Limitation on personal liability of fiduciary.

Except as otherwise provided in the contract, a fiduciary is not personally liable on a contract properly entered into in its capacity as a fiduciary in the course of administering the trust if the fiduciary in the contract disclosed the fiduciary capacity.

A fiduciary is personally liable for torts committed in the course of administering a trust, or for obligations arising from ownership or control of trust property, including liability for violation of environmental law, only if the fiduciary is personally at fault.

A claim based on a contract entered into by a fiduciary in its capacity as a fiduciary, on an obligation arising from ownership or control of trust property, or on a tort committed in the course of administering a trust, may be asserted in a judicial proceeding against the fiduciary in its capacity as a fiduciary, whether or not the fiduciary is personally liable for the claim.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1011.
Liability of successor fiduciaries for actions of predecessor.

Successor fiduciaries are not liable for actions, errors or omissions of any prior or predecessor fiduciaries.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1012.
Interest of trustee as general partner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section or unless personal liability is imposed in the contract, a trustee who holds an interest as a general partner in a general or limited partnership is not personally liable on a contract entered into by the partnership after the trust’s acquisition of the interest if the fiduciary capacity was disclosed in the contract or in a statement previously filed pursuant to W.S.

17-14-201

through

17-14-209

or

17-21-101

through

17-21-1105

.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a trustee who holds an interest as a general partner is not personally liable for torts committed by the partnership or for obligations arising from ownership or control of the interest unless the trustee is personally at fault.

The immunity provided by this section does not apply if an interest in the partnership is held by the trustee in a capacity other than that of trustee or is held by the trustee’s spouse or one (1) or more of the trustee’s descendants, siblings, or parents or the spouse of any of them.

If the trustee of a revocable trust holds an interest as a general partner, the settlor is personally liable for contracts and other obligations of the partnership as if the settlor were a general partner.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1013.
Protection of person dealing with fiduciary.

A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith assists a fiduciary, or who in good faith and for value deals with a fiduciary, without knowledge that the fiduciary is exceeding or improperly exercising the fiduciary’s powers is protected from liability as if the fiduciary properly exercised the power.

A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith deals with a fiduciary is not required to inquire into the extent of the fiduciary’s powers or the propriety of their exercise.

A person who in good faith delivers assets to a fiduciary need not ensure their proper application.

A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith assists a former fiduciary, or who in good faith and for value deals with a former fiduciary, without knowledge that the appointment has terminated is protected from liability as if the former fiduciary were still a fiduciary.

Comparable protective provisions of other laws relating to commercial transactions or transfer of securities by fiduciaries prevail over the protection provided by this section.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 4-10-1014.
Certification or affidavit of trust.

Instead of furnishing a copy of the trust instrument to a person other than a beneficiary, the trustee may furnish to the person a certification or affidavit of trust containing the following information:

That the trust exists and the date the trust instrument was executed;

The identity of the settlor;

The identity and address of the currently acting trustee;

The pertinent powers of the trustee;

The revocability or irrevocability of the trust and the identity of any person holding a power to revoke the trust;

The authority of cotrustees to sign or otherwise authenticate and whether all or less than all are required in order to exercise powers of the trustee;

The trust’s taxpayer identification number (optional); and

The manner of taking title to trust property.

A certification or affidavit of trust shall be signed or otherwise authenticated by any trustee.

A certification or affidavit of trust shall state that the trust has not been revoked, modified or amended in any manner that would cause the representations contained in the certification of trust to be incorrect.

A certification or affidavit of trust need not contain the dispositive terms of a trust or the trust’s taxpayer identification number.

A recipient of a certification or affidavit of trust may require the trustee to furnish copies of those excerpts from the original trust instrument and later amendments which designate the trustee and confer upon the trustee the power to act in the pending transaction.

A person who acts in reliance upon a certification or affidavit of trust without knowledge that the representations contained therein are incorrect is not liable to any person for so acting and may assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the certification or affidavit. Knowledge of the terms of the trust may not be inferred solely from the fact that a copy of all or part of the trust instrument is held by the person relying upon the certification or affidavit.

A person who in good faith enters into a transaction in reliance upon a certification or affidavit of trust may enforce the transaction against the trust property as if the representations contained in the certification or affidavit were correct.

A person making a demand for the trust instrument in addition to a certification or affidavit of trust or excerpts is liable for damages if the court determines that the person did not act in good faith in demanding the trust instrument.

This section does not limit the right of a person to obtain a copy of the trust instrument in a judicial proceeding concerning the trust.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2007, ch. 155, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “pertinent” in (a)(iv); inserted “(optional)” in (a)(vii); substituted “shall” for “may”
in (b); and added “or the trust's taxpayer identification number ”in (d).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.